District of Columbia statutes.
16-2303

Retention of jurisdiction.

For purposes of this subchapter, jurisdiction obtained by the Division in the case of a child shall be retained by it until the child becomes twenty-one years of age, unless jurisdiction is terminated before that time. This section does not affect the jurisdiction of other divisions of the Superior Court or of other courts over offenses committed by a person after he ceases to be a child. If a minor already under the jurisdiction of the Division is convicted in the Criminal Division or another court of a crime committed after he ceases to be a child, the Family Division may, in appropriate cases, terminate its jurisdiction.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 587, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2303.
1973 Ed., § 16-2303.

Editor's Notes

Appropriations approved: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2358, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that funds appropriated for expenses under this section for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1997, shall be available for obligations incurred under the Act in each fiscal year since inception in the fiscal year 1985.